Missouri, session 2026, SB1261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 194.321, RSMo, is repealed, to read as
follows:
[194.321. 1. For purposes of this
section, the following terms mean:
(1) "COVID-19 vaccination status", an
indication of whether a person has received a
vaccination against COVID-19;
(2) "Hospital", the same meaning given to
the term in section 197.020;
(3) "Procurement organization", the same
meaning given to the term in section 194.210.
2. Except if the organ being transplanted
is a lung, no hospital, physician, procurement
organization, or other person shall consider the
COVID-19 vaccination status of a potential organ
transplant recipient or potential organ donor in
any part of the organ transplant process
including, but not limited to:
(1) The referral of a patient to be
considered for a transplant;
(2) The evaluation of a patient for a
transplant;
(3) The consideration of a patient for
placement on a waiting list;
(4) A patient's particular position on a
waiting list; and
(5) The evaluation of a potential donor to
determine his or her suitability as an organ
donor.]
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.